Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3603
Act; applicability.

The Uniform Testamentary Additions to Trusts Act (1991) applies to a will of a testator who dies on or after August 28, 1999.

Laws 1999, LB 18, § 3.